Missouri, session 2026, SB849.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 393, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 393.2180, to read as
follows:
393.2180. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of natural
resources;
(2) "Solar project", a group of photovoltaic
interconnected solar panels or arrays that convert sunlight
into electricity for the primary purpose of wholesale or
retail sales of generated electricity, including all on-site
equipment and facilities necessary for the proper operation
of the facility, such as electrical collection and
transmission lines, battery storage systems, transformers,
substations, and operations and maintenance facilities.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, beginning the effective date of the act, there
shall immediately be a moratorium placed on the construction
of any solar project in the state, including but not limited

SB 849 2
to the issuance of permits for the construction of solar
projects in the state.
3. For any solar project that is currently being
constructed and for which construction has not completed
before the effective date of the act, all construction of
such solar project shall be suspended under the moratorium
under this section.
4. The department shall promulgate rules relating to
environmental issues concerning, but not limited to, the
construction, placement, and operation of a solar project.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after the effective date of the act, shall be
invalid and void.
5. The moratorium under this section shall end on
December 31, 2027. However, if the department does not
promulgate rules under subsection 4 of this section before
December 31, 2027, the moratorium shall continue until the
requirements under subsection 4 of this section have been
met.
Section B. Because of the hazards relating to the
construction and operation of solar projects, section A of
this act is deemed necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is

SB 849 3
hereby declared to be an emergency act within the meaning of
the constitution, and section A of this act shall be in full
force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✓